Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2350.02
School district or township treasurer; violation; penalty.

If the treasurer or ex officio treasurer of any school district or township willfully fails or refuses at any time to do or perform any act required of him or her by sections 77-2350 to 77-2352, he or she shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1967, c. 508, § 5, p. 1710;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 235;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 13.